Utah statutes.
41-6a-515.   Standards for chemical breath or oral fluids analysis --
Evidence.
(1)  The commissioner of the department shall establish standards for the
administration and interpretation of chemical analysis of a person's breath or
oral fluids, including standards of training.
(2)  In any action or proceeding in which it is material to prove that a
person was operating or in actual physical control of a vehicle while under
the influence of alcohol or any drug or operating with a blood or breath
alcohol content statutorily prohibited, documents offered as memoranda or
records of acts, conditions, or events to prove that the analysis was made and
the instrument used was accurate, according to standards established in
Subsection (1), are admissible if:
(a)  the judge finds that they were made in the regular course of the
investigation at or about the time of the act, condition, or event; and
(b)  the source of information from which made and the method and
circumstances of their preparation indicate their trustworthiness.
(3)  If the judge finds that the standards established under Subsection (1)
and the conditions of Subsection (2) have been met, there is a presumption
that the test results are valid and further foundation for introduction of the
evidence is unnecessary.
